District of Columbia statutes.
38-312.02

Student Residency Verification Fund.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Student Residency Verification Fund (“Fund”), which shall be used for the purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section. All funds deposited in the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

(b)

The Fund shall be used solely to fund enforcement activities concerning student residency and primary caregiver status verification.

(c)

The Fund shall be administered by the Office of the State Superintendent of Education.

(d)

The Fund shall consist of the revenue from the following sources:

(1)

All payments collected pursuant to this chapter; and

(2)

All non-resident tuition and fees collected pursuant to § 38-302(c).

History

Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 854, Pub. L. 86-725, § 15b
as added May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-126, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1939
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 4023, 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote (d).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section 3 of D.C. Law 19-126, see § 7012 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section 3 of D.C. Law 19-126, see § 7012 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4023 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-126 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan. D.C. Law 19-126, § 3, was repealed by D.C. Law 19-168, § 7012.